Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5483HV (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2494 Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 80. a. Prepare an annual report that 3 includes detailed information related to all of the following: 4 (1) The reading proficiency of students enrolled in school 5 districts in kindergarten through grade three, including 6 how well school districts are fulfilling the requirements 7 established in section 279.68. 8 (2) The mathematics proficiency of students enrolled in 9 school districts in kindergarten through grade six, including 10 how well school districts are fulfilling the requirements 11 established in section 279.68A. 12 b. Submit the annual report described in paragraph âaâ to 13 the general assembly on or before December 31 of each year and 14 publish the annual report on the departmentâs internet site. 15 NEW SUBSECTION . 81. a. Prepare an annual report that 16 includes a detailed and ongoing examination and evaluation of 17 the impact to area education agencies, and the operations of 18 area education agencies, made by 2024 Iowa Acts, ch. 1002. 19 b. Submit the annual report described in paragraph âaâ to 20 the general assembly on or before December 31 of each year and 21 publish the annual report on the departmentâs internet site. 22